Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Service Commission shall regulate utilities and enforce the provisions of
this chapter. The commission shall be a body corporate, with power to sue and be
sued in its corporate name. The commission may adopt a seal bearing the name
"Public Service Commission of Kentucky," which seal shall be affixed to all writs
and official documents, and to such other instruments as the commission directs,
and all courts shall take judicial note of the seal.
(2) The jurisdiction of the commission shall extend to all utilities in this state. The
commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of rates and
service of utilities, but with that exception nothing in this chapter is intended to
limit or restrict the police jurisdiction, contract rights, or powers of cities or
political subdivisions.
(3) The commission may adopt, in keeping with KRS Chapter 13A, reasonable
regulations to implement the provisions of KRS Chapter 278 and investigate the
methods and practices of utilities to require them to conform to the laws of this
state[,] and to all reasonable rules, regulations, and orders of the commission not
contrary to law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 1:28 PM Jacketed